Washington statutes.
RCW 18.59.060

Examinations.

(1) A person applying for licensure shall demonstrate eligibility in accordance with RCW 18.59.050 and shall apply for examination upon a form and in such a manner as the department prescribes. The application shall be accompanied by the fee prescribed by RCW 18.59.110, which fee shall not be refunded. A person who fails an examination may apply for reexamination. The application shall be accompanied by the prescribed fee.

(2) An applicant for licensure under this chapter shall be given a written examination to test the applicant's knowledge of the basic and clinical sciences relating to occupational therapy and occupational therapy theory and practice, including the applicant's professional skills of occupational therapy techniques and methods, and such other subjects as the board deems useful to determine the applicant's fitness to practice. The board shall approve the examination and establish standards for acceptable performance.

(3) Applicants for licensure shall be examined at a time and place and under such supervision as the board may determine. The examination shall be given at least twice each year at such places as the board determines, and the board shall give reasonable public notice of the examinations in accordance with its rules at least sixty days prior to the administration of the examination.

(4) Applicants may obtain their examination scores and may review their papers in accordance with such rules as the board establishes.

[ 1984 c 9 s 7.]